Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.460

Pesticide advisory board—Election of chair—Authority to call a meeting.

The pesticide advisory board established in RCW 17.21.455 shall elect a chair from among its membership. The pesticide advisory board shall meet from time to time at the call of the director, chair of the board, or a majority of the board.

[ 2023 c 378 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2023 c 378: See note following RCW 17.21.455.